Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-208.08
Insurance companies; organization; violation of law; personal liability of solicitors.

Any person, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which solicits any subscriptions for stock or any application for membership or for a policy or sells any surplus note for any insurer in process of organization in violation of law shall be personally liable to any person from whom he or she may have solicited such subscription for stock or application or to whom he or she may have sold such surplus note in an amount equal to that paid by the purchaser or applicant. Suit to recover the same may be brought by such purchasers or applicants, jointly or severally, in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state.

Laws 1957, c. 178, § 9, p. 615;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 55;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 219.